Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
ARTICLE 5
COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE ACT -
SERVICES AND PROGRAMS

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2006 containing provisions of some sections formerly located in article 4 of title 26. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 25.5-4-103.

Section

PART 1 MANDATORY PROVISIONS

PART 2 OPTIONAL PROVISIONS

PART 3 SERVICES WITH SPECIAL STATE PROVISIONS

PART 4 STATEWIDE MANAGED CARE SYSTEM

PART 5 PRESCRIPTION DRUGS

PART 6 PROGRAM FOR TEEN PREGNANCY AND DROPOUT PREVENTION

PART 7 TELEMEDICINE PILOT PROGRAMS FOR CHRONIC MEDICAL CONDITIONS

PART 8 CHILDREN AND YOUTH BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS